Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.192

Diagnosed concussions—Annual reports by public schools.

(1) Beginning with the 2020-21 school year, public schools must annually report information about each diagnosed concussion sustained by a student during athletic and other activities using a procedure developed by the department of health under RCW 43.70.435.

(2) At a minimum, the following information must be reported: Student's grade and gender, whether the student had a previous concussion, the event date and location of the diagnosed concussion, the type and level of activity that the student was participating in at the time of the event, whether it was a practice or competition, any known cause of the event, when during the activity the injury occurred, whether protective equipment was worn on the injured student's head at the time of the event, the type of surface on which the event occurred, who initially examined the student at the time of the event, whether the student was removed from the activity at the time of the event, and follow-up information related to whether the student was given a written authorization to return to the activity by the end of the season in which the event occurred and the amount of time before the student was authorized to return to the learning environment.

[ 2020 c 347 s 1.]